Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2655.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 321.231, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: The driver of any an authorized emergency vehicle or peace officer riding a police bicycle in the line of duty , may: House File 2655, p. 2 Sec. 2. Section 321.231, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new paragraphs: NEW PARAGRAPH . f. Proceed past a red or stop signal or stop sign, but only after slowing down to or maintaining a speed deemed necessary for safe operation by the driver based on information known to the driver at the time. This paragraph does not apply to a driver operating a towing vehicle that was issued a certificate of designation as an authorized emergency vehicle pursuant to section 321.451. NEW PARAGRAPH . g. Exceed the maximum speed limits so long as the driver does not recklessly endanger life or property. This paragraph does not apply to a driver operating a towing vehicle that was issued a certificate of designation as an authorized emergency vehicle pursuant to section 321.451. Sec. 3. Section 321.231, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended by striking the subsection. Sec. 4. Section 321.231, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 5. a. The exemptions granted to the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle under subsection 2 and to the driver of an official fire department vehicle, police vehicle, rescue vehicle, ambulance, emergency medical services vehicle, or emergency management vehicle as provided in subsection 3 shall apply only when such vehicle is making use of an audible warning device meeting the requirements of section 321.433 or a visual signaling device authorized under this chapter . b. The exemption granted under subsection 3 2 , paragraph âbâ âgâ , shall be granted to a peace officer or reserve peace officer operating an authorized emergency vehicle without using an audible warning device or visual signaling device if such action occurs over the shortest distance necessary, does not recklessly endanger persons or property, and if the officer is pursuing a suspected violator of the speed restrictions imposed by or pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of determining the speed of travel of such suspected violator, or if the officer reasonably believes based on the facts and circumstances at the time that a suspected violatorâs knowledge of the officerâs proximity may cause the suspected violator to destroy evidence of a suspected felony or aggravated House File 2655, p. 3 misdemeanor, evade apprehension, or endanger the public or the officer. c. The exemption granted under subsection 3 2 , paragraph âbâ âgâ , shall be granted to the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle transporting a patient to a hospital without using a visual signaling device or audible warning device if a certified emergency medical care provider reasonably believes the patientâs condition warrants rapid transport. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2655, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor